Hawaii statutes.
§832-17 Extension of time of commitment;
adjournment. If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the governor
by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant or bond, a judge may
discharge the accused or may recommit the accused for a further period not to
exceed sixty days, or a judge may again take bail for the accused's appearance
and surrender, as provided in section 832-16, but within a period not to exceed
sixty days after the date of new bond. [L 1941, c 99, §17; RL 1945, §10647; RL 1955,
§250-17; HRS §713-17; am L 1970, c 188, §39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch
1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next